Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 129D.17, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Children's museums. new text end new text begin A state agency or other recipient of an appropriation from the arts and cultural heritage fund that uses the appropriation for a program that awards competitive grants solely to children's museums may award grants only to applicants that meet the requirements of the A52 classification of the National Taxonomy of Exempt Entities used by the Internal Revenue Service, or the analogous code from a successor classification system. new text end